Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 14.10 An Act Adopting the Federal Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2009

19-14.10-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Secure and Fair Enforcement Mortgage Licensing Act of 2009”.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3.

19-14.10-2.
Purpose.

The activities of mortgage loan originators and the origination or offering of financing for residential real property have a direct, valuable, and immediate impact upon Rhode Island’s consumers, Rhode Island’s economy, the neighborhoods and communities of Rhode Island, and the housing and real estate industry. The general assembly finds that accessibility to mortgage credit is vital to the state’s citizens. The general assembly also finds that it is essential for the protection of the citizens of Rhode Island and the stability of Rhode Island’s economy that reasonable standards for licensing and regulation of the business practices of mortgage loan originators be imposed. The general assembly further finds that the obligations of mortgage loan originators to consumers in connection with originating or making residential mortgage loans are such as to warrant the regulation of the mortgage lending process. The purpose of this chapter is to protect consumers seeking mortgage loans and to ensure that the mortgage lending industry is operating without unfair, deceptive, and fraudulent practices on the part of mortgage loan originators. Therefore the general assembly establishes within this chapter:

System of supervision and enforcement. An effective system of supervision and enforcement of the mortgage lending industry, including:

The authority to issue licenses to conduct business under this chapter, including the authority to write rules or regulations or adopt procedures necessary to the licensing of persons covered under this chapter.

The authority to deny, suspend, condition, or revoke licenses issued under this chapter.

The authority to examine, investigate, and conduct enforcement actions as necessary to carry out the intended purposes of this chapter, including the authority to subpoena witnesses and documents, enter orders, including cease and desist orders, order restitution and monetary penalties, and order the removal and ban of individuals from office or employment.

Broad administrative authority. That the director of the department of business regulation (“director”), or the director’s designee, shall have the broad administrative authority to administer, interpret, and enforce this chapter, and promulgate rules or regulations implementing this chapter, in order to carry out the intentions of the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3.

19-14.10-3.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

“Depository institution” has the same meaning as in section 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, and includes any credit union.

“Federal banking agencies” means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Comptroller of the Currency, the Director of the Office of Thrift Supervision, the National Credit Union Administration, and the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

“Immediate family member” means a spouse, child, sibling, parent, grandparent, or grandchild. This includes stepparents, stepchildren, stepsiblings, and adoptive relationships.

“Individual” means a natural person.

“Loan processor or underwriter” means an individual who performs clerical or support duties as an employee at the direction of, and subject to the supervision and instruction of, a person licensed as a lender or as a loan broker, or exempt from licensing under chapter 14 or 14.1 of this title.

For purposes of subsection (5)(i), “clerical or support duties” may include subsequent to the receipt of an application:

The receipt, collection, distribution, and analysis of information common for the processing or underwriting of a residential mortgage loan; and

Communicating with a consumer to obtain the information necessary for the processing or underwriting of a loan, to the extent that such communication does not include offering or negotiating loan rates or terms, or counseling consumers about residential mortgage loan rates or terms.

An individual engaging solely in loan processor or underwriter activities shall not represent to the public, through advertising or other means of communicating or providing information including the use of business cards, stationery, brochures, signs, rate lists, or other promotional items, that such individual can or will perform any of the activities of a mortgage loan originator.

“Mortgage loan originator” means:

An individual who, for compensation or gain or in the expectation of compensation or gain:

Takes a residential mortgage loan application; or

Offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan;

Does not include an individual engaged solely as a loan processor or underwriter except as otherwise provided in §

19-14.10-4(c)

;

Does not include a person or entity who or that only performs real estate brokerage activities and is licensed or registered in accordance with Rhode Island law, unless the person or entity is compensated by a lender, a mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator or by any agent of such lender, mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator;

Does not include a person or entity solely involved in extensions of credit relating to timeshare plans, as that term is defined in 11 U.S.C. § 101(53D), as amended; and

Does not include a person (or its employees) engaged in servicing mortgage loans. For purposes of this exclusion, “servicing mortgage loans” means, on behalf of the note holder, collecting and receiving payments, including payments of principal, interest, escrow amounts, and other sums due, on obligations due and owing to the note holder pursuant to a residential mortgage loan, and, when the borrower is in default or in reasonably foreseeable likelihood of default, working with the borrower on behalf of the note holder and pursuant to the contract between the person servicing mortgage loans and the note holder, to modify but not refinance, either temporarily or permanently, the obligations, or otherwise finalizing collection of the obligation through the foreclosure process.

“Real estate brokerage activity” means any activity that involves offering or providing real estate brokerage services to the public, including:

Acting as a real estate agent or real estate broker for a buyer, seller, lessor, or lessee of real property;

Bringing together parties interested in the sale, purchase, lease, rental, or exchange of real property;

Negotiating, on behalf of any party, any portion of a contract relating to the sale, purchase, lease, rental, or exchange of real property (other than in connection with providing financing with respect to any such transaction);

Engaging in any activity for which a person engaged in the activity is required to be registered or licensed as a real estate agent or real estate broker under any applicable law; and

Offering to engage in any activity, or act in any capacity, described in subsection (6)(ii)(A), (B), (C), or (D) of this section.

“Nationwide Multistate Licensing System” means a mortgage licensing system developed and maintained by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators for the licensing and registration of licensed mortgage loan originators.

“Nontraditional mortgage product” means any mortgage product other than a thirty-year (30), fixed-rate mortgage.

“Person” means a natural person, corporation, company, limited-liability company, partnership, association, or any other entity however organized.

“Registered mortgage loan originator” means any individual who:

Meets the definition of mortgage loan originator and is an employee of:

A depository institution;

A subsidiary that is:

Owned and controlled by a depository institution; and

Regulated by a Federal banking agency; or

An institution regulated by the Farm Credit Administration; and

Is registered with, and maintains a unique identifier through, the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System.

“Residential mortgage loan” means any loan primarily for personal, family, or household use that is secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other equivalent, consensual security interest on a dwelling (as defined in § 103(v) of the Truth in Lending Act) or residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling (as so defined).

“Residential real estate” means any real property located in Rhode Island upon which is constructed, or intended to be constructed, a dwelling.

“SAFE Act” means the Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act, comprising §§ 1501-1517 of the Housing and Economic Recovery Act of 2008, Pub. L. No. 110-289.

“Unique identifier” means a number or other identifier assigned by protocols established by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 56, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 64, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 145, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 202, § 2; P.L. 2022, ch. 338, § 4, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 339, § 4, effective June 29, 2022.

19-14.10-4.
License and registration required.

An individual, unless specifically exempted from this chapter under subsection (b), shall not engage in the business of a mortgage loan originator with respect to any dwelling located in this state without first obtaining and maintaining annually a license under this chapter. Each licensed mortgage loan originator must register with and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and registry.

The following individuals are exempt from this chapter:

Registered mortgage loan originators, when acting for an entity described in §

19-14.10-3(10)(i)(A)

, (10)(i)(B), or (10)(i)(C) are exempt from this chapter.

Any individual who offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan with or on behalf of an immediate family member of the individual.

Any individual who offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan secured by a dwelling that served as the individual’s residence.

A licensed attorney who negotiates the terms of a residential mortgage loan on behalf of a client as an ancillary matter to the attorney’s representation of the client, unless the attorney is compensated by a lender, a mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator or by any agent of such lender, mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator.

A licensed attorney when performing loan closing services for a licensed lender, licensed loan broker, or for an entity exempt from licensing under §

19-14.1-10(a)(4)

;

A mortgage loan originator: (i) Who is employed by a lender or loan broker licensed under chapter 14 and/or chapter 14.1 of this title; (ii) Who works at a qualified location; (iii) Who is registered with, and maintains a unique identifier through, the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System; (iv) Who acts only as a mortgage loan originator for residential mortgage loans secured by dwellings (as defined in Section 103(v) of the Truth in Lending Act) constructed, or to be constructed, on real property located in states other than Rhode Island; and (v) Who is licensed or registered as required by applicable law in each state in which such real property is located. As used herein, the term “qualified location” means a location licensed under chapter 14 of this title that serves as the primary place of employment of at least one mortgage loan originator licensed under this chapter or a remote location.

An individual loan processor or underwriter who is an independent contractor may not engage in the activities of a loan processor or underwriter unless the independent contractor loan processor or underwriter obtains and maintains a license under chapter 14 of this title and this chapter. Each independent contractor loan processor or underwriter licensed as a mortgage loan originator must have and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and registry.

For the purposes of implementing an orderly and efficient licensing process the director, or the director’s designee, may establish licensing rules or regulations and interim procedures for licensing and acceptance of applications. For previously registered or licensed individuals the director, or the director’s designee, may establish expedited review and licensing procedures as follows:

A mortgage loan originator applicant whose employer at the time of application for a mortgage loan originator license is an entity described in §

19-14.10-3(10)(i)(A)

, (10)(i)(B), or (10)(i)(C) and who has been assigned a unique identifier through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and registry and who has completed and filed with the director, or the director’s designee, all information, documents, and requirements for licensure pursuant to this chapter shall be permitted to continue to act as a mortgage loan originator for the period prior to action being taken on his or her application by the director, or the director’s designee;

A mortgage loan originator applicant who has been assigned a unique identifier through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and who has completed and filed with the director, or the director’s designee, all information, documents, and requirements for licensure pursuant to this chapter and whose employer at the time of application for a mortgage loan originator license is a lender or loan broker licensed under chapters 14 and 14.1 of this title, shall be permitted to continue to act as a mortgage loan originator for the period prior to action being taken on his or her application by the director, or director’s designee, if the applicant and a senior officer or principal of such lender or loan broker files written attestation to the director, or the director’s designee that:

The applicant is currently, or has within the six-month (6) period prior to the date of the application, been acting as a registered mortgage loan originator in this state or as a state-licensed mortgage loan originator in another state, in either case under the provisions of Section 1507 of the SAFE Act, 12 U.S.C. § 5106;

The applicant has never had a mortgage loan license or registration denied, revoked, or suspended in any governmental jurisdiction; and

The applicant has not been convicted of a felony that would otherwise authorize the director, or the director’s designee, to deny the applicant a license.

Any provisional authority to act as a mortgage loan originator issued pursuant to this subsection (d) shall expire on the earlier of: (i) The date on which the director, or the director’s designee, issues or denies the application for the license; or (ii) One hundred twenty (120) days from the date of application for the license.

The director, or the director’s designee, may deny or suspend the rights of a lender or loan broker licensed under chapter 14 or 14.1 of this title to employ a mortgage loan originator under this subsection (d) if the director, or the director’s designee, finds that such lender or loan broker, a senior official or principal thereof, or the applicant failed to exercise due diligence and good faith when submitting the attestations required in subsection (d)(1) or (d)(2).

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 56, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 64, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 145, § 3; P.L. 2022, ch. 338, § 4, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 339, § 4, effective June 29, 2022.

19-14.10-5.
State license and registration application and issuance.

Applicants for a license shall apply in a form as prescribed by the director, or the director’s designee. Each such form shall contain content as set forth by rule, regulation, instruction, or procedure of the director, or the director’s designee, and may be changed or updated as necessary by the director, or the director’s designee, in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

In order to fulfill the purposes of this chapter, the director, or the director’s designee, is authorized to establish relationships or contracts with the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry or other entities designated by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry to collect and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons subject to this chapter.

In connection with an application for licensing as a mortgage loan originator, the applicant shall, at a minimum, furnish to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry information concerning the applicant’s identity, including:

Fingerprints for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and any governmental agency or entity authorized to receive such information for a state, national, and international criminal history background check; and

Personal history and experience in a form prescribed by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, including the submission of authorization for the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry and the director to obtain:

An independent credit report obtained from a consumer reporting agency described in § 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1681a(p); and

Information related to any administrative, civil, or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction.

For the purposes of this section and in order to reduce the points of contact which the Federal Bureau of Investigation may have to maintain for purposes of this section the director, or the director’s designee, may use the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from and distributing information to the U.S. Department of Justice or any governmental agency.

For the purposes of this section, and in order to reduce the points of contact that the director, or the director’s designee, may have to maintain for purposes of this section, the director, or the director’s designee, may use the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry as a channeling agent for requesting and distributing information to and from any source so directed by the director, or the director’s designee.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3.

19-14.10-6.
Issuance of license.

The director, or the director’s designee, shall not approve a mortgage loan originator license unless the director. or the director’s designee. makes at a minimum the following findings:

The applicant has never had a mortgage loan originator license revoked in any governmental jurisdiction, except that a subsequent formal vacation of such revocation shall not be deemed a revocation.

The applicant has not been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony in a domestic, foreign, or military court:

During the seven-year (7) period preceding the date of the application for licensing and registration; or

At any time preceding such date of application, if such felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, or a breach of trust, or money laundering.

Pardon of a conviction shall not be a conviction for purposes of this subsection.

The applicant has demonstrated financial responsibility, character, and general fitness such as to command the confidence of the community and to warrant a determination that the mortgage loan originator will operate honestly, fairly, and efficiently within the purposes of this chapter.

For purposes of this subsection, a person has shown that he or she is not financially responsible when he or she has shown a disregard in the management of his or her own financial condition. A determination that an individual has not shown financial responsibility may include, but not be limited to:

(i) (A)

Current outstanding judgments, except judgments solely as a result of medical expenses;

(B)

Current outstanding tax liens or other government liens and filings;

(C)

Foreclosures within the past three years;

(D)

A pattern of seriously delinquent accounts within the past three (3) years.

The applicant has completed the pre-licensing education requirement described in §

19-14.10-7

.

The applicant has passed a written test that meets the test requirement described in §

19-14.10-8

.

The applicant has met the net worth or surety bond requirements required pursuant to §

19-14.10-14

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 56, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 64, § 2.

19-14.10-7.
Pre-licensing and re-licensing education of loan originators.

In order to meet the pre-licensing education requirement referred to in this chapter, a person shall complete at least twenty (20) hours of education approved in accordance with subsection (b), which shall include at least:

Three (3) hours of Federal law and regulations;

Three (3) hours of ethics, which shall include instruction on fraud, consumer protection, and fair-lending issues;

Two (2) hours of training related to lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace; and

Three (3) hours of Rhode Island law and regulations.

For purposes of subsection (a), pre-licensing education courses shall be reviewed and approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry based upon reasonable standards. Review and approval of a pre-licensing education course shall include review and approval of the course provider.

Nothing in this section shall preclude any pre-licensing education course, as approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry that is provided by the employer of the applicant or an entity that is affiliated with the applicant by an agency contract, or any subsidiary or affiliate of such employer or entity.

Pre-licensing education may be offered either in a classroom, online, or by any other means approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

The pre-licensing education requirements approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry for any state shall be accepted as credit towards completion of pre-licensing education requirements in Rhode Island.

A person, previously licensed under this chapter subsequent to the effective date of this chapter applying to be licensed again, must prove that they have completed all of the continuing education requirements for the year in which the license was last held.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3.

19-14.10-8.
Testing of loan originators.

In order to meet the written test requirement referred to in this chapter, an individual shall pass, in accordance with the standards established under this subsection, a qualified written test developed by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and administered by a test provider approved by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System based upon reasonable standards.

A written test shall not be treated as a qualified written test for purposes of this section unless the test adequately measures the applicant’s knowledge and comprehension in appropriate subject areas, including:

Ethics;

Federal law and regulation pertaining to mortgage origination;

State law and regulation pertaining to mortgage origination;

Federal and state law and regulation, including instruction on fraud, consumer protection, the nontraditional mortgage marketplace, and fair-lending issues.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a test provider approved by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System from providing a test at the location of the employer of the applicant or the location of any subsidiary or affiliate of the employer of the applicant, or the location of any entity with which the applicant holds an exclusive arrangement to conduct the business of a mortgage loan originator.

An individual shall not be considered to have passed a qualified written test unless the individual achieves a test score of not less than seventy-five percent (75%) correct answers to questions.

An individual may retake a test three (3) consecutive times with each consecutive taking occurring at least thirty (30) days after the preceding test.

After failing three (3) consecutive tests, an individual shall wait at least six (6) months before taking the test again.

A licensed mortgage loan originator who fails to maintain a valid license for a period of three (3) years or longer shall retake the test, not taking into account any time during which such individual is a registered mortgage loan originator.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3; P.L. 2022, ch. 338, § 4, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 339, § 4, effective June 29, 2022.

19-14.10-9.
Standards for license renewal.

The minimum standards for license renewal for mortgage loan originators shall include the following:

The mortgage loan originator continues to meet the minimum standards for license issuance under §

19-14.10-6

.

The mortgage loan originator has satisfied the annual continuing education requirements described in §

19-14.10-10

.

The mortgage loan originator has paid all required fees for renewal of the license.

The license of a mortgage loan originator failing to satisfy the minimum standards for license renewal shall expire. The director, or the director’s designee, may adopt procedures for the reinstatement of expired licenses consistent with the standards established by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3.

19-14.10-10.
Continuing education for mortgage loan originators.

In order to meet the annual continuing education requirements referred to in §

19-14.10-9

, a licensed mortgage loan originator shall complete at least (8) hours of education approved in accordance with subsection (b), which shall include at least:

Three (3) hours of federal law and regulations;

Two (2) hours of ethics, which shall include instruction on fraud, consumer protection, and fair-lending issues;

Two (2) hours of training related to lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace; and

One hour of Rhode Island law and regulations.

For purposes of this section, continuing education courses shall be reviewed and approved by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System based upon reasonable standards. Review and approval of a continuing education course shall include review and approval of the course provider.

Nothing in this section shall preclude any education course, as approved by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, that is provided by the employer of the mortgage loan originator or an entity that is affiliated with the mortgage loan originator by an agency contract, or any subsidiary or affiliate of such employer or entity.

Continuing education may be offered either in a classroom, online, or by any other means approved by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System.

A licensed mortgage loan originator:

Except for §

19-14.10-9(b)

and subsection (i) of this section, may only receive credit for a continuing education course in the year in which the course is taken; and

May not take the same approved course in the same or successive years to meet the annual requirements for continuing education.

A licensed mortgage loan originator who is an approved instructor of an approved continuing education course may receive credit for the licensed mortgage loan originator’s own annual continuing education requirement at the rate of two (2) hours credit for every one hour taught.

A person having successfully completed the education requirements approved by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System in subsections (a)(1), (a)(2), and (a)(3) for any state shall be accepted as credit towards completion of continuing education requirements in Rhode Island. Nothing herein shall relieve an applicant of the obligation to satisfy educational requirements specifically related to Rhode Island law and regulations.

An individual who:

Fails to acquire a valid mortgage loan originator license or federal registration within three (3) years from the date of federal compliance with any approved pre-licensure education (PE) program; or

Has obtained a mortgage loan originator license or federal registration but did not maintain an active license or federal registration for at least three (3) years must complete at least twenty (20) hours of PE in order to be eligible for state mortgage loan originator licensure.

A person meeting the requirements of §

19-14.10-9(a)(1)

and (a)(3) may make up any deficiency in continuing education as established by rule or regulation of the director, or the director’s designee.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3; P.L. 2022, ch. 338, § 4, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 339, § 4, effective June 29, 2022.

19-14.10-11.
Authority to require license.

In addition to any other duties imposed upon the director, or the director’s designee, by law, the director, or the director’s designee, shall require mortgage loan originators to be licensed and registered through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. In order to carry out this requirement the director, or the director’s designee, is authorized to participate in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. For this purpose, the director, or the director’s designee, may establish by rule or regulation requirements as necessary, including but not limited to:

Background checks for:

Criminal history through fingerprint or other databases;

Civil or administrative records;

Credit history; or

Any other information as deemed necessary by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

The payment of fees to apply for or renew licenses through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry;

The setting or resetting as necessary of renewal or reporting dates; and

Requirements for amending or surrendering a license or any other such activities as the director, or the director’s designee, deems necessary for participation in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3.

19-14.10-12.
Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry information challenge process.

The director, or the director’s designee, shall establish a process whereby mortgage loan originators may challenge information entered into the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry by the director, or the director’s designee.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3.

19-14.10-13.
Enforcement authorities, violations and penalties.

In order to ensure the effective supervision and enforcement of this chapter, the director, or the director’s designee, may, pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42:

Deny, suspend, revoke, condition, or decline to renew a license for a violation of this chapter, rules or regulations issued under this chapter, or order or directive entered under this chapter;

Deny, suspend, revoke, condition, or decline to renew a license if an applicant or licensee fails at any time to meet the requirements of §

19-14.10-6

or §

19-14.10-9

, or withholds information or makes a material misstatement in an application for a license or renewal of a license;

Order restitution against persons subject to this chapter for violations of this chapter;

Impose fines on persons subject to this chapter pursuant to subsections (b), (c), and (d); and

Issue orders or directives under this chapter as follows:

Order or direct persons subject to this chapter to cease and desist from conducting business, including immediate temporary orders to cease and desist;

Order or direct persons subject to this chapter to cease any harmful activities or violations of this chapter, including immediate temporary orders to cease and desist;

Enter immediate temporary orders to cease business under a license or interim license issued pursuant to the authority granted under this chapter if the director, or the director’s designee, determines that such license was erroneously granted or the licensee is currently in violation of this chapter; and

Order or direct such other affirmative action as the director, or the director’s designee, deems necessary.

The director, or the director’s designee, may impose a civil penalty on a mortgage loan originator and any lender or loan broker licensed under chapter 14 or 14.1 of title 19 that employs such mortgage loan originator, if the director, or the director’s designee, finds, on the record after notice and opportunity for hearing, that such mortgage loan originator has violated or failed to comply with any requirement of this chapter or any regulation prescribed by the director, or the director’s designee, under this chapter or order issued under authority of this chapter. In addition, the director, or the director’s designee may impose a civil penalty on a lender or loan broker licensed under chapter 14 or 14.1 of title 19 that employs any mortgage loan originator licensed under this chapter, if the director, or the director’s designee, finds, on the record after notice and opportunity for hearing, that such lender or loan broker has violated or failed to comply with any requirement of this chapter or any such regulation or order.

The maximum amount of penalty for each act or omission described in subsection (b) shall be twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

Each violation or failure to comply with any directive or order of the director, or the director’s designee, is a separate and distinct violation or failure.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3; P.L. 2012, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 84, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 517, § 1.

19-14.10-14.
Surety bond required.

Each mortgage loan originator shall be covered by a surety bond in accordance with this section. In the event that the mortgage loan originator is an employee of a lender or loan broker licensed under chapter 14 of title 19, the surety bond of such lender or loan broker as required in accordance with the provisions of such chapter, increased to any higher amount, required by this section can be used in lieu of the mortgage loan originator’s surety bond requirement.

The surety bond shall provide coverage for each mortgage loan originator in an amount as prescribed in subsection (b).

The surety bond shall be in a form as prescribed by the director, or the director’s designee.

The director, or the director’s designee, may promulgate rules or regulations with respect to the requirements for such surety bonds as are necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

The penal sum of the surety bond shall be maintained in an amount that reflects the dollar amount of loans originated as determined by the director, or the director’s designee, by regulation adopted within one hundred twenty (120) days of the effective date of this section.

When an action is commenced on a licensee’s bond, the director, or the director’s designee, may require the filing of a new bond.

Immediately upon recovery upon any action on the bond the licensee shall file a new bond.

The director, or the director’s designee, shall, within one hundred twenty (120) days of the effective date of this section, promulgate rules or regulations with respect to the requirements for surety bonds as are necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 145, § 3.

19-14.10-15.
Confidentiality.

In order to promote more effective regulation and reduce regulatory burden through supervisory information sharing:

Except as otherwise provided in public law 110-289, § 1512 (12 U.S.C. § 5111), the requirements under any federal law, or chapter 2 of title 38 of the general laws of Rhode Island regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any information or material provided to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, and any privilege arising under federal or state law (including the rules of any federal or state court) with respect to such information or material, shall continue to apply to such information or material after the information or material has been disclosed to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. Such information and material may be shared with all state and federal regulatory officials with mortgage industry oversight authority without the loss of privilege or the loss of confidentiality protections provided by federal law or chapter 2 of title 38 of the general laws of Rhode Island.

For these purposes, the director, or the director’s designee, is authorized to enter agreements or sharing arrangements with other governmental agencies, the Conference of State Bank Supervisors, the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators or other associations representing governmental agencies as established by rule, regulation, or order of the director, or the director’s designee.

Information or material that is subject to a privilege or confidentiality under subsection (a) shall not be subject to:

Disclosure under any federal or state law governing the disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or an agency of the federal government or the respective state; or

Subpoena or discovery, or admission into evidence, in any private civil action or administrative process, unless with respect to any privilege held by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry with respect to such information or material, the person to whom such information or material pertains waives, in whole or in part, in the discretion of such person, that privilege.

Section

19-4-3

relating to the disclosure of confidential supervisory information or any information or material described in this section that is inconsistent with this section shall be superseded by the requirements of this section.

This section shall not apply with respect to the information or material relating to the employment history of, and publicly adjudicated disciplinary and enforcement actions against, mortgage loan originators that is included in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry for access by the public.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3.